Missouri, session 2026, SB1220.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 579, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 579.018, to read as
follows:
579.018. 1. A person commits the offense of coerced
criminal abortion by means of fraud if the person knowingly
and intentionally engages in the use of an abortion-inducing
drug on a pregnant woman without her knowledge or consent
with the intent to cause an abortion.
2. The offense of coerced criminal abortion by means
of fraud is a class B felony.
3. A prosecution of a person under this section shall
not be a defense against a prosecution under any other
provision of law, including murder, if the person commits
the offense of coerced criminal abortion by means of fraud
and the use of an abortion-inducing drug results in the
death or serious bodily injury of the pregnant woman.
✓